Illinois, session 104th, HB4729.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Veterans' Dependents and Spouses College Tuition Waiver Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) veterans and their families have made 9    extraordinary sacrifices in service to this State and the 10    United States;11        (2) while this State provides tuition assistance 12    programs for veterans themselves, educational barriers 13    remain for the spouses and dependents of veterans, 14    particularly those affected by service-connected 15    disability or death; and16        (3) access to affordable postsecondary education for 17    veterans' families strengthens this State's workforce, 18    economy, and communities.19    (b) The purpose of this Act is to expand access to public 20higher education by waiving tuition and mandatory fees for 21eligible spouses and dependents of State veterans at public 22institutions of higher education.   HB4729- 2 -LRB104 17634 LNS 31065 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 3Commission.4    "Dependent" means a child of an eligible veteran, 5including a biological child, adopted child, or stepchild who 6is claimed as a dependent for federal income tax purposes or 7otherwise meets eligibility requirements established by rule.8    "Eligible veteran" means a person who:9        (1) served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the 10    United States;11        (2) received an honorable discharge; and12        (3) is or was, at the time of death, a resident of this 13    State as defined under rules adopted by the Commission.14"Eligible veteran" includes:15        (A) a veteran who has a service-connected disability 16    rated at 30% or greater by the United States Department of 17    Veterans Affairs;18        (B) a veteran who was killed in the line of duty;19        (C) a veteran who died as a result of a 20    service-connected disability; or21        (D) a veteran who is missing in action or classified 22    as a prisoner of war.23    "Public institution of higher education" means a public 24community college or public university in this State.25    "Spouse" means a person legally married to an eligible 26veteran.  HB4729- 3 -LRB104 17634 LNS 31065 b1    "Tuition and mandatory fees" means charges assessed by a 2public institution of higher education for enrollment, 3instruction, and institution-wide fees required of all 4students, excluding room, board, books, supplies, and 5transportation. 6    Section 15. Eligibility for and award of waiver.7    (a) An applicant is eligible for a waiver of tuition and 8mandatory fees at a public institution of higher education 9under this Act if the applicant:10        (1) is a spouse or dependent of an eligible veteran;11        (2) is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at the 12    public institution of higher education; and13        (3) meets residency and enrollment requirements 14    established by rule.15    (b) The Commission shall award waivers to eligible 16applicants, and a public institution of higher education shall 17waive tuition and mandatory fees for the recipient of a 18particular waiver. 19    Section 20. Scope of benefit.20    (a) A waiver awarded under this Act:21        (1) applies only to tuition and mandatory fees; and22        (2) does not include room, board, books, supplies, or 23    other nonmandatory expenses.24    (b) The waiver is available for:  HB4729- 4 -LRB104 17634 LNS 31065 b1        (1) up to the equivalent of 4 academic years of 2    full-time enrollment; or3        (2) an equivalent amount of credit hours, as 4    determined by rule.5    (c) The waiver may be used only for undergraduate 6coursework, unless otherwise authorized by the General 7Assembly. 8    Section 25. Administration.9    (a) The Commission shall administer the waivers created by 10this Act.11    (b) The Commission shall:12        (1) establish application procedures and verification 13    requirements;14        (2) adopt rules to coordinate the waivers with other 15    State and federal educational benefits;16        (3) ensure that recipients do not receive duplicative 17    State tuition benefits for the same academic term; and18        (4) notify a public institution of higher education 19    that tuition and mandatory fees must be waived for the 20    recipient of a particular waiver. 21    Section 30. Coordination with other benefits. 22    (a) The benefits under this Act shall be applied after 23federal educational benefits have been applied, unless 24otherwise provided by rule.  HB4729- 5 -LRB104 17634 LNS 31065 b1    (b) Nothing in this Act prohibits an applicant from 2receiving federal educational benefits, including benefits 3under federal veterans educational-assistance laws, as long as 4there is no duplication of State-funded tuition assistance. 5    Section 90. Rulemaking. The Commission may adopt any rules 6necessary to implement and administer this Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.